Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,193
Amusement ride; permit required; inspection.

Except for purposes of testing and inspection, no amusement ride shall be operated without a valid permit for the operation issued by the State Fire Marshal to the owner of such amusement ride. The owner of an amusement ride shall apply for a permit under section 81-5,195 to the State Fire Marshal on an application furnished by the State Fire Marshal and shall include such information as the State Fire Marshal may require. Every amusement ride shall be inspected before it is originally put into operation for public use and at least once every year after such ride is put into operation for public use.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1804;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 29.